test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-pewasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - пэвась: # Verb 'to be dark' /Type 7/ - partial paradigm

     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: пэвъиниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: пэвъидиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: пэвъихиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: пэвъиваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: пэвъидаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: пэвъиˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: пэвъидмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: пэвъин
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: пэвъи
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: пэвъининзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: пэвъидинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: пэвъихинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: пэвъиваць
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: пэвъидаць
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: пэвъиць  
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: пэвъидамзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: пэвъинась
     пэвась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: пэвъись
     пэвась+V+IV+ConNeg: пэбюˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: пэвӈгуниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: пэвӈгудиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пэвӈгухуʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: пэвӈгуваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: пэвӈгудаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пэвӈгуˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: пэвӈгудмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: пэвӈгун
     пэвась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пэвӈгу
     пэвась+V+IV+GerFin: пэвванзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Ger: [пэва, пэвась]
     пэвась+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: пэвханиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: пэвхаваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: пэвхадмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: пэбидиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: пэбидаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: пэбюˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: пэбиниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: пэбидиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пэбихиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: пэбиваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: пэбидаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пэбиˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: пэбидмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: пэбин
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пэби
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: пэбининзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: пэбидинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пэбихинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: пэбиваць
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: пэбидаць
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пэбиць
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: пэбидамзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: пэбинась
     пэвась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пэбись
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Abl+Pl+Abs: пэввахат
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Abl+Sg+Abs: пэввахад
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Acc+Du+Abs: пэввахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Acc+Pl+Abs: пэвби
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Acc+Sg+Abs: пэввамʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Dat+Pl+Abs: пэввахаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Dat+Sg+Abs: пэвванʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Gen+Du+Abs: пэввахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Gen+Pl+Abs: пэвбиˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Gen+Sg+Abs: пэвваʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Loc+Pl+Abs: пэввахаˮна
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Loc+Sg+Abs: пэввахана
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Nom+Du+Abs: пэввахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Nom+Pl+Abs: пэвваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Nom+Sg+Abs: пэвва
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Pros+Pl+Abs: пэвбиˮмна
     пэвась+V+IV+InfImprf+Pros+Sg+Abs: пэввавна
     пэвась+V+IV+InfPrf+Abl+Sg+Abs: пэвˮмахад
     пэвась+V+IV+InfPrf+Acc+Sg+Abs: пэвˮмамʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfPrf+Dat+Sg+Abs: пэвˮманʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfPrf+Gen+Sg+Abs: пэвˮмаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+InfPrf+Loc+Sg+Abs: пэвˮмахана
     пэвась+V+IV+InfPrf+Nom+Sg+Abs: пэвˮма
     пэвась+V+IV+InfPrf+Pros+Sg+Abs: пэвˮмавна
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1: пэвдарханиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2: пэвдархадиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3: пэвдархахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1: пэвдархаваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2: пэвдархадаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3: пэвдархаˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1: пэвдархадмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2: пэвдархан
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3: пэвдарха
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1: пэвдарханинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2: пэвдархадинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3: пэвдархаханзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1: пэвдархаваць
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2: пэвдархадаць
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3: пэвдархаць
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1: пэвдархадамзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2: пэвдарханась
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3: пэвдархась
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu1: пэвраваниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu2: пэвравадиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu3: пэвравахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl1: пэврававаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl2: пэвравадаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl3: пэвраваˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg1: пэвравадмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg2: пэвраван
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg3: пэврава
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: пэвавндарханиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: пэввэрханиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: пэвавндархадиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: пэввэрхадиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: пэвавндархахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: пэввэрхахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: пэвавндархаваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: пэввэрхаваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: пэвавндархадаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: пэввэрхадаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: пэвавндархаˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: пэввэрхаˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: пэвавндархадмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: пэввэрхадмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: пэвавндархан
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: пэввэрхан
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: пэвавндарха
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: пэввэрха
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: пэврахавэниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: пэврахавэдиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: пэврахавэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: пэврахавэваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: пэврахавэдаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: пэврахавыˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: пэврахавэдмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: пэврахавэн
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: пэврахавы
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: пэвсаниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: пэвсадиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: пэвсахаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: пэвсаваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: пэвсадаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: пэвсаˮ     
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: пэвсадмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: пэвсан
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: пэвса
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: пэввэниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: пэввэдиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: пэввэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: пэввэваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: пэввэдаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: пэввыˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: пэввэдмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: пэввэн
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: пэввы
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: пэввэнинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: пэввэдинзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: пэввэхэнзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: пэввэваць
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: пэввэдаць
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [пэввыць, пэввэць]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: пэввэдамзь
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: пэввэнась
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [пэввысь, пэввэсь]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: пэвбцуниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: пэвбцудиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: пэвбцухуʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: пэвбцуваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: пэвбцудаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: пэвбцуˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: пэвбцудмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: пэвбцун
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: пэвбцу
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: пэвбцакэниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: пэвбцакэдиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: пэвбцакэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: пэвбцакэваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: пэвбцакэдаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: пэвбцакыˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: пэвбцакэдмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: пэвбцакэн
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: пэвбцакы
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1: пэввэкэниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2: пэввэкэдиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3: пэввэкэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1: пэввэкэваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2: пэввэкэдаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3: пэввэкыˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1: пэввэкэдмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2: пэввэкэн
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3: пэввэкы
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: пэвдакэниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: пэвдакэдиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: пэвдакэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: пэвдакэваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: пэвдакэдаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: пэвдакыˮ 
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: пэвдакэдмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: пэвдакэн
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: пэвдакы
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu1: [пэвавнаниʼ, пэвувнаниʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu2: [пэвавнадиʼ, пэвувнадиʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu3: [пэвавнахаʼ, пэвувнахаʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl1: [пэвавнаваˮ, пэвувнаваˮ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl2: [пэвавнадаˮ, пэвувнадаˮ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl3: [пэвавнаˮ, пэвувнаˮ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg1: [пэвавнадмʼ, пэвувнадмʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg2: [пэвавнан, пэвувнанʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg3: [пэвавна, пэвувна]
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu1: пэвванӈгабяниʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu2: пэвванӈгабядиʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu3: пэвванӈгабяхаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl1: пэвванӈгабяваˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl2: пэвванӈгабядаˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl3: пэвванӈгабяˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg1: пэвванӈгабядмʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg2: пэвванӈгабян
     пэвась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg3: пэвванӈгабя
     пэвась+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: пэваяхаʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: пэваяˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: пэвая
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcFut+Nom+Sg+Abs: [пэваванда, пэвувнда]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Abl+Pl+Abs: [пэвдахат, пэвдяхат]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Abl+Sg+Abs: [пэвдахад, пэвдяхад]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Acc+Du+Abs: [пэвдахаʼ, пэвдяхаʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Acc+Pl+Abs: пэвди 
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Acc+Sg+Abs: [пэвдамʼ, пэвдямʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Dat+Pl+Abs: [пэвдахаˮ, пэвдяхаˮ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Dat+Sg+Abs: [пэвданʼ, пэвдянʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Gen+Du+Abs: [пэвдахаʼ, пэвдяхаʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Gen+Pl+Abs: пэвдиˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Gen+Sg+Abs: [пэвдаʼ, пэвдяʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Loc+Pl+Abs: [пэвдахаˮна, пэвдяхаˮна]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Loc+Sg+Abs: [пэвдахана, пэвдяхана]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Nom+Du+Abs: [пэвдахаʼ, пэвдяхаʼ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Nom+Pl+Abs: [пэвдаˮ, пэвдяˮ]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Nom+Sg+Abs: [пэвда, пэвдя]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pros+Pl+Abs: пэвдиˮмна
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pros+Sg+Abs: [пэвдавна, пэвдявна]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcNeg+Nom+Sg+Abs: [пэвавдавэй, пэвувдавэй]
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Abl+Pl+Abs: пэввэхэт
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Abl+Sg+Abs: пэввэхэд
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Acc+Du+Abs: пэввэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Acc+Pl+Abs: пэввы
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Acc+Sg+Abs: пэввымʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Dat+Pl+Abs: пэввэхэˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Dat+Sg+Abs: пэввэнʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Gen+Du+Abs: пэввэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Gen+Pl+Abs: пэввыˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Gen+Sg+Abs: пэввыʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Loc+Pl+Abs: пэввэхэˮна
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Loc+Sg+Abs: пэввэхэна
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Nom+Du+Abs: пэввэхэʼ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Nom+Pl+Abs: пэввыˮ
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Nom+Sg+Abs: пэввы
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pros+Pl+Abs: пэввыˮмана
     пэвась+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pros+Sg+Abs: пэввэвна
